Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-920
Bribery of a juror; penalty; juror receiving bribe; penalty.

(1) A person commits bribery of a juror if he offers, confers, or agrees to confer any benefit upon a juror with intent to influence the juror's vote, opinion, decision, or other action as a juror.

(2) Bribery of a juror is a Class IV felony.

(3) A juror commits a Class IV felony if he accepts or agrees to accept any benefit from another person for the purpose of influencing his vote, opinion, decision, or other action as a juror.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 205.